Wisconsin, session 2025, AB668.
do enact as follows:AB668,11Section 1. 51.61 (1) (g) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB668,2,22251.61 (1) (g) 3. Following a final commitment order, other than for a subject 3individual who is determined to meet the commitment standard under s. 51.20 (1) 4(a) 2. e., have the right to exercise informed consent with regard to all medication 5and treatment unless the committing court or the court in the county in which the 6individual is located, within 10 days after the filing of the motion of any interested 7person and with notice of the motion to the individual’s counsel, if any, the 8individual and the applicable counsel under s. 51.20 (4), makes a determination, 9following a hearing, that the individual is not competent to refuse medication or 10treatment or unless a situation exists in which the medication or treatment is 11necessary to prevent serious physical harm to the individual or others. A report, if 12any, on which the motion is based shall accompany the motion and notice of motion 13and shall include a statement signed by a licensed physician that asserts that the 14subject individual needs medication or treatment and that the individual is not 15competent to refuse medication or treatment, based on an examination of the 16individual by a licensed physician or by an advanced practice registered nurse who 17may issue prescription orders under s. 441.09 (2) and who through education or 18experience has expertise in psychiatric care. The hearing under this subdivision 19shall meet the requirements of s. 51.20 (5), except for the right to a jury trial. At the 20request of the subject individual, the individual’s counsel or applicable counsel 21under s. 51.20 (4), the hearing may be postponed, but in no case may the postponed 22hearing be held more than 20 days after a motion is filed.AB668,21Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB668,3,72(1) For the period beginning on the effective date of this subsection and ending 3on September 1, 2026, a report under s. 51.61 (1) (g) 3. may be based on an 4examination of the individual by a licensed physician or an advanced practice 5registered nurse who through education or experience has expertise in psychiatric 6care. For purposes of this subsection, “advanced practice registered nurse” has the 7meaning given in s. 154.01 (1g).AB668,38Section 3. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 9publication, except as follows:AB668,3,1010(1) The treatment of s. 51.61 (1) (g) 3. takes effect on September 1, 2026.AB668,3,1111